tables/ja-kantenji.utb
noback context ["ヒャ"]%hiragana @5-278-37
noback context ["ヒュ"]%hiragana @5-2578-37
noback context ["ヒョ"]%hiragana @5-3578-37
noback context ["ヒャ"]~ @5-278-37
noback context ["ヒュ"]~ @5-2578-37
noback context ["ヒョ"]~ @5-3578-37

noback context `["ファ"]~ @38-278-37
noback context ["ファ"]%hiragana @38-278-37
noback context `["フィ"]~ @38-2378-37
noback context ["フィ"]%hiragana @38-2378-37

noback context `["フォ"]~ @38-3578-37
noback context ["フォ"]%hiragana @38-3578-37

noback context `[]%katakana @367
noback context %katakana[]~ @37
noback context %katakana[]!%katakana @37
noback context !%katakana[]%katakana @367
#end Katakana rules

#begin alphabet rules
noback context %loweralphabet[]%katakana @0
noback context %space[]%lowercase @68
noback context `[]%lowercase @68
noback context %alphabet[]%sign @0

noback context "a"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "b"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "c"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "d"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "e"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "f"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "g"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "h"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "i"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "j"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "k"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "l"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "m"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "n"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "o"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "p"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "q"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "r"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "s"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "t"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "u"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "v"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "w"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "x"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "y"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "z"[]%katakana @0-367

noback context "A"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "B"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "C"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "D"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "E"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "F"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "G"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "H"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "I"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "J"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "K"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "L"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "M"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "N"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "O"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "P"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "Q"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "R"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "S"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "T"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "U"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "V"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "W"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "X"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "Y"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "Z"[]%katakana @0-367

noback context "ａ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "ｂ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "ｃ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "ｄ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "ｅ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "ｆ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "ｇ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "ｈ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "ｉ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "ｊ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "ｋ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "ｌ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "ｍ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "ｎ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "ｏ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "ｐ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "ｑ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "ｒ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "ｓ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "ｔ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "ｕ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "ｖ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "ｗ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "ｘ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "ｙ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "ｚ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "Ａ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "Ｂ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "Ｃ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "Ｄ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "Ｅ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "Ｆ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "Ｇ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "Ｈ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "Ｉ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "Ｊ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "Ｋ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "Ｌ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "Ｍ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "Ｎ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "Ｏ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "Ｐ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "Ｑ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "Ｒ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "Ｓ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "Ｔ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "Ｕ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "Ｖ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "Ｗ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "Ｘ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "Ｙ"[]%katakana @0-367
noback context "Ｚ"[]%katakana @0-367

noback context %sign[]%loweralphabet @68
noback context %punctuation[]%loweralphabet @68

noback context !%alphabet["@"] @68-358
noback context ["@"]!%alphabet @68-358
noback context !%alphanum["/"] @568-57
noback context !%alphanum[":"] @6-3
#end alphabet rules

#begin numbers rules
noback context %digit[]%alphabet @68
#end numbers rules

#begin Kanji rules
# upper dots Kantenji, with no dots7-8, are preceded with dot8 when they are at the beginning of the line or after a space.
# If with no preceding dot8, it's confusing telling dots123456 ⠿ from dots235678 ⣶.
noback context `[]%upperkantenji @8
noback context %space[]%upperkantenji @8
#end Kanji rules

#end character class rules
